Louisiana, session 2026, HB41.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 11:2260(A)(2)(introductory paragraph) and (a) and (3) are hereby
amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§2260. Administration
A. Board of trustees:
* * *
(2) The board shall consist of at least thirteen trustees as follows:
(a) Two members of the Professional Fire Fighters Association who shall be
members Five active members of the system and who shall be elected by a majority
of the officers of the association as follows: who shall have at least ten years of
service credit and who shall be elected by active members of the system as follows:
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-313 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 41
(i) One member shall be elected in December, 1988, to take office January
1, 1989, to serve until January 1, 1992, and his successor shall be elected for a term
of five years, commencing on January 1, 1992. Three members shall be active
members of the Professional Fire Fighters Association.
(ii) One member shall be elected in December, 1988, to take office January
1, 1989, to serve until January 1, 1993, and his successor shall be elected for a term
of five years, commencing on January 1, 1993. One member shall be an active
member of the system not participating in the Professional Fire Fighters Association.
(iii) One member shall be an active member of the Louisiana Fire Chiefs
Association.
* * *
(3) If an active member dies while serving on the board, the vacancy shall
be filled for the unexpired term in the same manner as the office was previously
filled. If an active member's status changes such that he would no longer qualify for
the position he holds on the board of trustees, or if an active member retires or a
member terminates employment after participating in the Deferred Retirement
Option Plan and retires, while serving on the board, he shall continue to serve until
his term expires. If any other vacancy occurs in the office of a trustee, the vacancy
shall be filled for the unexpired term in the same manner as was previously filled.
Should the term of a board member expire during the period of participation in the
Deferred Retirement Option Plan, he shall be eligible to seek reelection to his
position while participating in the Deferred Retirement Option Plan. A vacancy in
the membership of the board shall be filled for the unexpired term in the manner
provided in Paragraph (A)(2) of this Section.
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 11:2260(A)(2)(b) is hereby repealed in its entirety.
Section 3. The terms of the members of the board of trustees of the Firefighters'
Retirement System elected prior to the effective date of this Act pursuant to R.S.
11:2260(A)(2)(a) and (b) shall terminate on the effective date of this Act; however, such
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-313 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 41
members shall remain in office until the board members are elected as provided in this Act
and take office.
Section 4. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.